Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2941
Mediation subject to other laws; claim of privilege; disclosures authorized.

Mediation of a parenting plan shall be subject to the Uniform Mediation Act and the Dispute Resolution Act, to the extent such acts are not in conflict with the Parenting Act. Unsigned mediated agreements under the Parenting Act are not subject to a claim of privilege under subdivision (a)(1) of section 25-2935. In addition to disclosures permitted in section 25-2936, a mediator under the Parenting Act may also disclose a party's failure to schedule an individual initial screening session or a mediation session.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 22.

Dispute Resolution Act, see section 25-2901.

Uniform Mediation Act, see section 25-2930.